04_Morphology/kw.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>		! Morpheme boundary
%<n%>		! Noun
%<pl%>		! Plural
%<sg1%>		! 1 person sg
%<sg2%>		! 2 person sg
%<sg3%>		! 3 person sg
%<pl1_i%>	! 1 person pl inclusive
%<pl1_e%>	! 1 person pl exclusive
%<pl1%>		! 1 person pl
%<pl3%>		! 3 person pl
%<nom%>		! Nominative
%<acc%>		! Accusative
%<inst%>	! Instrumental
%<ab%>		! Abessive
%<dat%>		! Dative/Benefactive
%<gen%>		! Genitive 
%<caus%>	! Causative
%<loc%>		! Locative
%<dir%>		! Directional
%<inc%>		! Inclusive
%<term%>	! Terminative
%<tran%>	! Transitive
%<abl%>		! Ablative
%<comit%>	! Comitative
%<imm%>		! Immeditate
%<intr%>	! Intrative
%<exc%>		! Exclusive
%<comp%>	! Comparative
%<der_v%>       ! transforms a noun into a verb meaning
%<v%>		! Verb
%{k%}
%{rin%}
%{nin%}

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;

LEXICON N
%<n%>: POSS ;
%<n%>: PL ;
%<n%>: CASE ;
#;

LEXICON POSS
%<sg1%>:%>y PL ;
%<sg1%>:%>y CASE ;
%<sg2%>:%>yki PL ;
%<sg2%>:%>yki CASE ;
%<sg3%>:%>n PL ;
%<sg3%>:%>n CASE ;
%<pl1_i%>:%>nchik PL ;
%<pl1_i%>:%>nchik CASE ;
%<pl1_e%>:%>yku PL ;
%<pl1_e%>:%>yku CASE ;
%<pl2%>:%>ykichik PL ;
%<pl2%>:%>ykichik CASE ;
%<pl3%>:%>nku PL ;
%<pl3%>:%>nku CASE ;
#;

LEXICON PL
%<pl%>:%>kuna CASE ;
# ;

LEXICON CASE
%<nom%>: # ;
%<acc%>:%>%{k%}ta # ;
%<inst%>:%>wan # ;
%<ab%>:%>naq # ;
%<dat%>:%>paq # ;
%<gen%>:%>pa # ;
%<caus%>:%>rayku # ;
%<loc%>:%>pi # ;
%<dir%>:%>man # ;
%<inc%>:%>piwan # ;
%<term%>:%>kama # ;
%<tran%>:%>%{rin%}ta # ;
%<abl%>:%>piqta # ;
%<comit%>:%>%{nin%}tin # ;
%<imm%>:%>raq # ;
%<intr%>:%>pura # ;
%<exc%>:%>llam # ;
%<comp%>:%>naw # ;
# ;

LEXICON DER_V
%<der_v%>:%>chay V ; ! to x

LEXICON V
%<v%>: # ;

LEXICON Nouns
wasi:wasi N ; ! house
warmi:warmi N ;	! woman
qhari:qhari N ; ! man
irqi:irqi N ; ! child
mama:mama N ; ! mother
tayta:tayta N ; ! father
uywa:uywa N ; ! animal
sacha:sacha N ; ! tree
waska:waska N ; ! rope
runtu:runtu N ; ! egg
chukcha:chukcha N ; ! hair
chaki:chaki N ; ! foot
qucha:qucha N ; ! lake
yaku:yaku N ; ! water
inti:inti N ; ! sun
killa:killa N ; ! moon
tanta:tanta N ; ! bread
chanka:chanka N ; ! leg
kiru:kiru N ; ! tooth
runa:runa N ; ! human being
tanta:tanta DER_V; ! to make bread
wasi:wasi DER_V ; ! to built a house
